Tables/Contraction/zh-tw-polyphone.cti
always 鬆散 15-12346-3-15-1236-4
always 鬍子 1235-34-2-125-156-1
always 鬚子 15-1256-3-125-156-1
always 鬼子 13-1246-4-125-156-1
always 鮮少 15-2345-4-24-146-4
always 鮮恥 15-2345-4-12-156-4
always 鴨子 23456-3-125-156-1
always 鴻爪 1235-12346-2-1-146-4
always 鴿子 13-2346-3-125-156-1
always 鵠的 1235-34-2-145-16-5
always 麥子 134-2456-5-125-156-1
always 麻子 134-345-2-125-156-1
always 黃冠 1235-456-2-13-12456-3
always 點子 145-2345-4-125-156-1
always 鼓譟 13-34-4-125-146-5
always 鼻子 135-16-2-125-156-1
always 龜茲 245-234-3-245-156-2
always 龜裂 13-256-3-14-346-5
always 音樂 1456-3-236-5
always 策划 245-2346-5-1235-35-5
always 为了 1246-5-14-2346-1
always 的确 145-16-2-245-236-5
always 成长 12-1356-2-1-1346-4
always 商量 24-1346-3-14-46-2
always 胆子 145-1236-4-125-156-1
always 干吧 13-1236-5-135-345-1
always 因为 1456-3-1246-5
always 回应 1235-1246-2-13456-5
always 处理 12-34-4-14-16-4
always 行藏 15-13456-2-245-1346-2
always 九重 13-234-4-12-12346-2
always 站长 1-1236-5-1-1346-4
always 店铺 145-2345-5-1234-34-5
always 兴趣 15-13456-5-245-1256-5
always 执著 1-156-2-1-25-2
always 计划 13-16-5-1235-35-5
